Utah statutes.
73-10-25.   Contents of fund -- Investment -- Contributions.
(1)  The Water Resources Conservation and Development Fund consists of:
(a)  monies appropriated to it by the Legislature;
(b)  monies received from the sale of project water and power, less operating
and maintenance costs;
(c)  annual payments on contracts for projects constructed under Section
73-10-24 or the State Water Conservation Program; and
(d)  other monies or tax revenues designated by the Legislature to be credited
to the Water Resources Conservation and Development Fund.
(2)  All monies deposited into the Water Resources Conservation and
Development Fund shall be invested by the state treasurer with interest
accruing to the Water Resources Conservation and Development Fund, except for
payments, if any, necessary to comply with Section 148(f), Internal Revenue
Code of 1986.
(3)  Contributions of money, property, or equipment may be received from any
political subdivision of the state, federal agency, water users' association,
person, or corporation for use in carrying out the purposes of Section
73-10-24.
